District of Columbia statutes.
36-305.02

Severability.

If any provision or part thereof of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is declared unconstitutional or invalid, such invalidity, unconstitutionality, or inapplicability shall not affect any other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end, all provisions of this chapter are hereby declared to be severable.

History

Apr. 19, 1977, D.C. Law 1-123, § 6-402, 24 DCR 2371

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 10-242.
1973 Ed., § 10-242.